Hawaii statutes.
Subpart 3. Priority

§490:9-317 Interests that take priority
over or take free of security interest or agricultural lien. (a) A
security interest or agricultural lien is subordinate to the rights of:

(1) A person entitled to priority under section 490:9-322;
and

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), a
person that becomes a lien creditor before the earlier of the time:

(A) The security interest or agricultural
lien is perfected; or

(B) One of the conditions specified in
section 490:9-203(b)(3) is met and a financing statement covering the
collateral is filed.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(e), a buyer, other than a secured party, of tangible chattel paper, tangible
documents, goods, instruments, or certificated security takes free of a
security interest or agricultural lien if the buyer gives value and receives
delivery of the collateral without knowledge of the security interest or
agricultural lien and before it is perfected.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(e), a lessee of goods takes free of a security interest or agricultural lien
if the lessee gives value and receives delivery of the collateral without
knowledge of the security interest or agricultural lien and before it is
perfected.

(d) A licensee of a general intangible or a
buyer, other than a secured party, of collateral other than tangible chattel
paper, tangible documents, goods, instruments, or a certificated security takes
free of a security interest if the licensee or buyer gives value without
knowledge of the security interest and before it is perfected.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in sections
490:9-320 and 490:9-321, if a person files a financing statement with respect
to a purchase-money security interest before or within twenty days after the
debtor receives delivery of the collateral, the security interest takes
priority over the rights of a buyer, lessee, or lien creditor which arise
between the time the security interest attaches and the time of filing. [L
2000, c 241, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 228, §4; am L 2004, c 163, §§30, 31; am L
2012, c 33, §7]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next